Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB157.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Rural Health Care Grant Program Act.Section 2. Legislative intent.It is the intent of the General Assembly through this legislation to:(1) Allow entities in designated medically underserved areas and rural areas to have an opportunity to recruit and retain high quality practitioners.(2) Have more practitioners available to practice in designated medically underserved areas and rural areas.(3) Give patients in designated medically underserved 1234567891011121314151617 areas and rural areas more access to practitioners.(4) Prevent the possible closure of entities in designated medically underserved areas and rural areas due to practitioner shortages.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Birth center." As defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."DENTAL HYGIENIST." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF MAY 1, 1933 (P.L.216, NO.76), KNOWN AS THE DENTAL LAW."DENTIST." AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED IN THE PRACTICE OF DENTISTRY UNDER THE DENTAL LAW."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Designated medically underserved area." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 1301 of the act of December 2, 1992 (P.L.741, No.113), known as the Children's Health Care Act."Education debt." Debt incurred for professional schooling to practice as a practitioner in this Commonwealth."Entity." A birth center, a federally qualified health center, a rural health clinic or a hospital."Federally qualified health center." As defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(l)(2)(B) (relating to definitions). The term includes a federally qualified health center look-alike."Full-time." A practitioner who works on average more than 30 hours per week or more than 130 hours per month."Grant." A sum of money that is awarded to an entity by the department under this act.20250HB0157PN0475 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Hospital." A general acute care or specialty hospital located in a designated medically underserved area or rural county."Licensed practical nurse." An individual licensed to practice practical nursing under the act of March 2, 1956 (1955 P.L.1211, No.376), known as the Practical Nurse Law."Midwife or nurse-midwife." As defined in section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985."Nurse." A licensed practical nurse or registered nurse."Physician." Either:(1) as defined in section 2 of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act; or(2) as defined in section 2 of the Medical Practice Act of 1985."PRACTICE OF DENTISTRY." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE DENTAL LAW."Practitioner." A physician, nurse or, midwife or nurse-midwife, DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST."Program." The Rural Health Care Grant Program established under section 4."Registered nurse." An individual licensed to practice professional nursing under the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law."Rural county." A county within this Commonwealth where the population density is less than 284 persons per square mile as defined by the Center for Rural Pennsylvania."Rural health clinic." As defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1395x(aa)(2) (relating to definitions) and certified by Medicare.20250HB0157PN0475 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Establishment.The Rural Health Care Grant Program is established in the department to be administered by the department.Section 5. Use of money.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall distribute grants to an entity in accordance with this act from money appropriated for the program by the General Assembly.(b) Distribution by entity.--An entity shall use the grant awarded under subsection (a) to pay for the education debt of practitioners that the entity employs according to the following:(1) An entity shall pay the applicable creditor or designated person of the education debt on behalf of the practitioner.(2) Within 30 days after disbursement of money to the applicable creditor or designated person, an entity shall report to the department the following:(i) The date the payment was sent to the applicable creditor or designated person.(ii) The amount of the payment.(iii) The name and address of the applicable creditor or designated person.(iv) The names of the practitioners whose education debt was paid by the entity with the grant.(c) Receipt.--A written or electronic receipt of payment of education debt shall be issued to a practitioner employed by the entity whose education debt was paid by a grant under this act.Section 6. Grant awards.(a) Criteria for grant from department.--The department shall award a grant to an entity that is located in a designated 20250HB0157PN0475 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medically underserved area or rural county. Priority shall be given to independent entities not owned by, managed by or affiliated with any health care system, a legally separate health care provider or other entity.(b) Limitation of awards.--(1) The department may not award more than $250,000 to an entity in one calendar year.(2) The amount distributed to a practitioner may not exceed the amount owed in education debt.(c) Entity award.--An entity shall distribute the grant to one or more chosen practitioners who are employed by the entity. In order to receive a payment of education debt, a practitioner must:(1) Work a minimum of three years for the entity that distributed the grant to pay for education debt.(2) Be licensed to practice as a practitioner in this Commonwealth under the applicable licensing board of the Department of State.(3) Begin work within six months of accepting a position with the entity paying for the education debt.(4) Be employed as a full-time practitioner for the entity providing the grant.Section 7. Entity application for a grant.(a) Requirements.--Applications shall:(1) Be submitted by an entity to the department in a manner the department deems appropriate.(2) Be available electronically.(3) Include documentation as deemed necessary by the department.(b) Certification.--An entity shall certify in good faith 20250HB0157PN0475 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that the information provided in the application and all supporting documents and forms are true and accurate in all material aspects. An entity, or an authorized representative of the entity, that knowingly makes a false statement to obtain a grant shall be subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).Section 8. Review of application.(a) Selection.--The department shall select an appropriate number of entities to receive a grant under this act each calendar year, dependent upon the amount of money appropriated for the program by the General Assembly.(b) Approval or disapproval.--No later than 60 days after an entity's submission or resubmission of an application, the department shall approve or deny the application for a grant. The department shall provide a notice to the entity that:(1) the application for a grant is approved for an amount determined by the department; or(2) the application for a grant is denied. The department shall provide its reasons for denial of the application. The entity may resubmit its application based upon the department's reasons for denying the application.Section 9. Grant agreements.Upon approval of an application under section 8, the department shall enter into a grant agreement with the entity to award a grant under this act. The grant agreement shall explain the terms and conditions of the grant, including the applicable laws of this Commonwealth and all reporting requirements. The department, an entity and any other party, as deemed necessary by the department, may enter into the grant agreement via electronic signature.20250HB0157PN0475 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 10. Disbursement of grants.The following shall apply to the disbursement of grants:(1) The department shall determine the number of grants to be awarded with the money appropriated by the General Assembly.(2) For approved grants, the department shall award a grant to an entity in increments of $10,000 up to the limit under section 6(b)(1). The department may award a grant of less than $10,000 if the department determines that a decrease is necessary to preserve adequate funding for more grants.(3) An entity shall report to the department the initial date of employment for each practitioner who receives payment of education debt and the date of departure from employment for each practitioner, if applicable.(4) The department shall begin disbursement of grant money to an entity within 90 days after the approval of an entity's application.Section 11. Reports.(a) Content.--No later than December 31 of each year, the department shall publish a report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website that contains the following information:(1) The number of grants awarded under this act.(2) The number of practitioners who received a payment of their education debt.(3) The license type and practice area of each practitioner, as applicable.(4) The name and address of each entity that received a grant under this act.20250HB0157PN0475 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The amount of each grant awarded.(6) The total amount of the appropriation distributed each calendar year.(7) An aggregate total for each designated medically underserved area or rural county where a practitioner awarded grant money is employed by an entity.(b) Confidentiality.--The name, address and other personal information of a practitioner who received a payment of education debt from an entity may not be listed on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and may not be considered accessible under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(c) Submission.--The department shall submit the report under subsection (a) to the following:(1) The chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chair and minority chair of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(4) The chair and minority chair of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Final report.--After disbursement of all money appropriated for the program, the department shall publish a final report with the information listed under this section within six months.Section 12. Tax applicability.Grants awarded under this act may not be considered taxable income to an entity or practitioner under the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.20250HB0157PN0475 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 13. Compliance.(a) Reimbursement for noncompliance.--The department shall determine compliance with the requirements of this act. If an entity or practitioner fails to comply with the requirements of this act, the entity or practitioner shall reimburse the Commonwealth for the amount of the grant received or awarded based on the period of noncompliance, including interest accrued, as determined by the department based on a determination of which party violated this act. The department, entity and practitioner shall make every effort to resolve conflicts in order to prevent a breach of the program requirements established by the department.(b) Agreement between entity and practitioner.--An entity that receives a grant under this act may require a practitioner awarded money to enter into an agreement established by the entity and determine compliance, including the timing of disbursement of the grant money, as appropriate to facilitate the purposes and intent of this act and subject to the requirements of this act.Section 14. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB0157PN0475 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021